CALLER  ID  SPOOFING 

S.  HRG.  110–1139 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  21,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

74–894 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 21, 2007  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Association, Inc. 

Cerasale, Jerry, Senior Vice President, Government Affairs, Direct Marketing 
...................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Jones,  Hon.  Ron,  Commissioner,  Tennessee  Regulatory  Authority;  Chairman, 
Consumer  Affairs  Committee,  National  Association  of  Regulatory  Utility 
Commissioners 
.....................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Knight,  Allison,  Staff  Counsel  and  Director,  Privacy  and  Human  Rights 
Project, Electronic Privacy Information Center (EPIC)  ....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Monteith, Kris Anne, Chief, Enforcement Bureau, FCC  ......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
19 
1 
2 
22 

6 
8 

16 
17 

12 
13 
3 
5 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........

27 

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

CALLER  ID  SPOOFING 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  21,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  11:03  a.m.,  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bill  Nelson,  pre-
siding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Good  morning.  Over  the  past  few  years,  con-
sumers have been hit with a number of new scams that seek to use 
our  Nation’s  telecommunications  network  for  fraudulent  purposes, 
from pretexting to spyware. Fraudsters are always looking for new 
ways to invade our privacy and personal and financial information 
and one of the newest scams is called Caller ID Spoofing. 

It’s  a  technique  that  allows  a  telephone  caller  to  alter  the  tele-
phone  number  and  other  information  that  appears  on  the  recipi-
ent’s  Caller  ID  system.  It’s  an  easy  scam  to  pull.  All  an  individual 
needs  to  do  is  go  to  one  of  a  number  of  Internet  sites  with  names 
like  Tricktell.com  and  SpoofTell.com,  to  gain  access  to  spoofing 
services  and  on  these  sites,  an  identify  thief  can  pay  money  to 
order a spoofed telephone, tell the website what telephone number 
they wish to reach and then place a spoofed telephone call through 
a  toll-free  line.  A  number  of  recent  news  stories  have  highlighted 
the serious harm that is caused by this practice. 

One  recent  example—fraudsters  used  Caller  ID  spoofing  to  pose 
as  court  officers  calling  to  say  that  the  individual  had  missed  jury 
duty.  The  caller  then  says  that  a  warrant  will  be  issued  for  their 
arrest unless they pay a fine with a credit or bank card during the 
call and you know what the result is going to be. 

In  another  case,  identity  thieves  and  criminals  have  used  Caller 
ID  spoofing  to  hack  into  a  bank  account  and  into  voicemail  ac-
counts to steal sensitive personal information. 

Now  while  these  examples  are  serious  enough,  just  think  what 
could  happen  if  a  stalker  used  Caller  ID  spoofing  to  trick  someone 
into  answering  their  phone  and  providing  information  on  where 
they are and the results could be tragic. So it’s time to put an end 
to Caller ID spoofing. 

The bipartisan Truth in Caller ID Act of 2007 will plug the hole 
in  the  current  law  and  make  it  clear  that  spoofing  is  a  scam  and 
is  not  legal.  So  it  is  my  privilege  to  chair  this  hearing  on  behalf 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

of  Senator  Inouye  and  the  Vice  Chairman  of  the  Committee,  I 
would turn to him, Senator Stevens. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, Senator. I’m grateful to 
Senator  Inouye  for  calling  this  hearing.  These  ID  services  provide 
us all with information that we need. Really, I’m delighted to have 
the  information.  When  I  see  who  is  calling  me,  I  can  tell  whether 
to pick it up right away or ask my staff to deal with it if it is some-
thing that I don’t have the time for. 

This idea that some people can alter that ID information bothers 
me  considerably  because  it  means  that  a  loss  of  privacy  means 
identity  theft  possibilities  and  really  as  Senator  Nelson  has  men-
tioned,  can  compromise  personal  safety.  We  need  to  understand 
those  concerns  and  to  try  to  make  a  record  and  that’s  what  we’re 
going  to  do  today  with  your  help  so  that  others  will  review  what 
this  panel  gives  us  to  determine  what  holes  are  in  our  laws  and 
if  they  can  be  filled  to  address  and  prevent  this  spoofing  practice. 
I’m  particularly  worried  about  the  fraudulent  aspects  that  Sen-
ator  Nelson  has  mentioned,  particularly  where  it  could  lead  to  ob-
taining money under totally false pretenses. It ought to be against 
the law already but I want to find out if there is any way and any-
one  in  law  enforcement  working  to  deal  with  that  directly  at  this 
time.  Senator  Nelson,  Senator  Snowe  and  Senator  McCaskill  have 
introduced  this  bill.  It’s  going  to  come  before  the  Committee  next 
week  and  this  will  be  the  only  hearing,  the  only  opportunity  we 
have  to  get  a  record  for  other  members  to  learn  about  this.  So  I’m 
particularly concerned about the law enforcement actions that have 
been taken. I congratulate the sponsors but will it provide the tools 
that  law  enforcement  needs  to  really  improve  enforcement  activi-
ties and will it provide the information that is necessary? 

I’d  like  to  see  something  developed  and  invented  so  that  if  I  see 
something  on  my  Caller  ID  that  I  want  to  preserve  then  I  could 
transfer it. We lose that immediately—once we hang up, we’ve lost 
that  ID.  What  the  telephone  records  might  show  would  be  one 
thing  but  what  has  shown  on  ID  is  another  thing,  is  my  under-
standing. Though somehow or another, we’ve got to be able to find 
a  way  to  preserve  that  information  to  show  the  fraudulent  activi-
ties involved. And we get a great many calls from around the coun-
try and when we get a Caller ID that indicates to us it’s a governor 
or it’s someone from major organization and we’re working on that 
legislation, we ought to be able to rely on that ID. 

This  fraudulent  ID  concept  goes  to  really,  I  think  contact  vio-
lating the Constitutional concept that people have the right to con-
tact  Congress  to  redress  wrongs,  but  if  they  are  contacting  us 
under  false  pretences,  we’ve  got  to  have  a  way  to  know  it.  So  I 
think  this  is  a  very  important  piece  of  legislation.  I  do  hope  the 
record  will  help  us  convince  the  other  members  of  the  Committee 
of that fact. 

I  look  forward  to  the  hearing.  Unfortunately,  I  have  to  go  some-

where at half past, so I’ll wrap up. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  Senator  Stevens,  thank  you  for  your  en-
couraging  and  supportive  comments.  And  here’s  another  example. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

A  couple  of  years  ago,  a  sharp-shooting  SWAT  team  shut  down  a 
neighborhood  in  New  Brunswick,  New  Jersey,  after  they  received 
what  they  thought  was  a  distress  call  coming  from  an  apartment 
in the neighborhood and it turned out it was a spoof call and it put 
a lot of lives at risk, time after time. 

Well,  we’ve  got  a  distinguished  panel.  Ms.  Kris  Monteith,  Chief 
of the Enforcement Bureau of the FCC, Mr. Jerry Cerasale, Senior 
Vice President of Government Affairs of the Direct Marketing Asso-
ciation,  Ms.  Allison  Knight,  Staff  Counsel  and  Director  of  Privacy 
and  Human  Rights  Project,  Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center 
and Mr. Ron Jones, Director of the Tennessee Regulatory Authority 
and  Chairman  of  the  Consumer  Affairs  Committee  of  the  National 
Association  of  Regulatory  Utility  Commissioners.  So  welcome,  all. 
Your written statements are entered into the record and because 
of  the  constraints  of  time,  I  would  appreciate  it  if  you  could  talk 
directly to us. We’ll go right in the order in which I introduced you, 
without  you  reading  your  testimony  to  us  because  we’re  going  to 
have  it  as  part  of  the  record,  if  you  would  give  us  your  thoughts. 
So let’s start with you, Ms. Monteith. 

STATEMENT OF KRIS ANNE MONTEITH, CHIEF, 

ENFORCEMENT BUREAU, FCC 

Ms.  MONTEITH.  Good  morning.  Thank  you  very  much,  Vice 
Chairman Stevens, Senator Nelson and members of the Committee. 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  you  today  about  the 
problem of caller identification spoofing. As you’ve stated, Caller ID 
services lets customers identify who’s calling them before they pick 
up  the  phone,  such  as  by  a  telephone  number,  a  name  or  business 
number displayed on the customer’s equipment. Caller ID spoofing 
refers to the practice in which the Caller ID information is manipu-
lated  in  a  manner  that  misleads  the  call  recipient  about  the  iden-
tity of the caller. 

The Commission is deeply concerned about reports that Caller ID 
information  is  being  manipulated  for  fraudulent  or  deceptive  pur-
poses and the impact of those practices on the public trust and con-
fidence in the telecommunications industry. 

We are particularly concerned about how this practice may affect 
consumers  as  well  as  public  safety  and  law  enforcement  commu-
nities.  I  think  you’re  aware  of  some  of  the  technical  means  by 
which caller identification travels with the phone call so I won’t go 
into detail and I think that information is in my written testimony. 
The  Commission  also  has  addressed  caller  identification  on  the 
public  switched  telephone  network  in  rules  that  were  adopted  in 
1995 and generally, those rules require all carriers using Signaling 
System  7—SS7—to  transmit  the  calling  party  number  associated 
with an interstate call to interconnecting carriers. This same Com-
mission rule also requires telemarketers to transmit accurate Call-
er ID information. 

With the development of the Internet and IP technologies, Caller 
ID  spoofing  has  apparently  been  made  easier—even  easier  than  it 
used  to  be.  Now  entities  using  IP  technology  can  generate  false 
calling information and pass it to the PSTN via SS7. 

The  Commission’s  Enforcement  Bureau  has  been  investigating 
this practice since it came to our attention in the summer of 2005, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

having  come  to  our  attention  in  the  context  of  junk  fax  spoofing. 
To date, we have initiated investigations on 13 companies engaged 
in  the  marketing  and  selling  of  Caller  ID  spoofing  services  to  cus-
tomers. One investigation has resulted in a citation against a tele-
marketer  called  Intelligent  Alternatives  for  rule  violations  includ-
ing  violations  of  the  Caller  ID  rules  under  Section  64.1601  of  our 
rules. 

We’ve sent formal Letters of Inquiry to these entities and, at the 
same  time,  served  subpoenas  on  them  to  compel  them  to  respond 
to  our  inquiries.  In  some  cases,  we  followed  up  with  subsequent 
Letters  of  Inquiry  to  uncover  additional  evidence  of  possible  viola-
tions. 

Importantly, our investigations have revealed that the companies 
that  are  engaged  in  these  practices  are  of  varying  degrees  of  so-
phistication  that  employ  disparate  methods  and  technologies  to 
provide service to different types of customers. Some of the compa-
nies, for example, claim that they are involved in legitimate activi-
ties,  providing  spoofing  services  only  to  customers  such  as  law  en-
forcement  officials,  private  investigators,  or  to  others  that  are  en-
gaged  in  the  furtherance  of  debt  collection  or  other  similar  types 
of activities. 

The  companies  allow  customers  to  customize,  so  to  speak,  the 
services  that  they  select.  For  example,  in  some  cases,  the  spoofing 
companies claim that they do not allow the customer to decide the 
particular  false  number  to  be  displayed  on  the  called  parties’  ID 
while  others  do  provide  that  functionality.  This  functionality  is 
very  important  because  it  implicates  whether  or  not  a  spoofer 
would  permit  the  customer  to  use  911  as  a  spoofed  number  or 
whether the customer could, for example, choose another telephone 
number that might be a government number—and as you suggest, 
Senator  Nelson—or  the  number  of  other  emergency  services  pro-
viders. 

The Enforcement Bureau is continuing to gather and analyze in-
formation  about  the  companies’  practices,  their  network,  busi-
nesses,  and  customers,  and  other  relevant  matters  that  will  assist 
us  in  fully  understanding  the  issues  and  whether  violations  of  the 
Communications Act have, in fact, occurred. 

In addition to our enforcement efforts, the Commission has taken 
steps  to  prevent  those  engaged  in  Caller  ID  spoofing  for  deceptive 
reason from successfully accessing the personal information of tele-
communications  customers.  In  a  recent  order  tightening  the  Com-
mission’s  Customer  Proprietary  Network  Information  rules,  we  de-
termined  that  a  carrier  providing  call  history  information  over  the 
phone to a customer must first call that customer back at the tele-
phone  number  of  record  to  ensure  that  the  individual  calling  is,  in 
fact,  the  customer  rather  than  relying  on  the  Caller  ID  as  an  au-
thentication  method,  thereby  eliminating  one  of  the  major  tools  of 
pretexters. 

As we’ve testified previously, the Commission may not have suffi-
cient  authority  to  fully  address  this  issue  of  spoofing.  Some  of  the 
entities under investigation, do not appear to be directly regulated 
by  the  Commission  and,  in  fact,  they’ve  made  this  assertion  in  re-
sponse  to  our  investigations.  Thus,  legislation  that  clarifies  the 
Commission’s authority in this area would be helpful. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

In  conclusion,  just  to  reiterate  that  the  intentional  manipulation 
of  Caller  ID  information  is  an  issue  of  importance  to  the  Commis-
sion,  particularly  where  it  is  used  for  fraudulent  or  deceptive  rea-
sons.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  members  of  the  Committee 
and  other  Members  of  Congress  to  ensure  that  the  public  main-
tains  its  confidence  in  the  telecommunications  industry.  Thank 
you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Monteith follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KRIS ANNE MONTEITH, CHIEF, 

ENFORCEMENT BUREAU, FCC 

Good  morning  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  and  members  of  the 
Committee.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  about  the  problem  of  caller 
identification (Caller ID) spoofing. 

As you know, Caller ID services let customers identify who is calling them before 
they  answer  a  call  by  displaying  the  caller’s  telephone  number  or  other  informa-
tion—such  as  a  name  or  business  name—on  the  customer’s  equipment  before  the 
customer  picks  up  the  phone.  ‘‘Caller  ID  spoofing’’  refers  to  a  practice  in  which  the 
Caller ID information transmitted with a telephone call is manipulated in a manner 
that misleads the call recipient about the identity of the caller. The use of Internet 
technology to make phone calls has apparently made Caller ID spoofing even easier. 
The  Commission  is  deeply  concerned  about  reports  that  Caller  ID  information  is 
being  manipulated  for  fraudulent  or  other  deceptive  purposes  and  the  impact  of 
those practices on the public trust and confidence in the telecommunications indus-
try. We are particularly concerned about how this practice may affect consumers as 
well as public safety and law enforcement communities. 

In  my  testimony,  I  will  first  provide  a  brief  technical  background  on  Caller  ID 
spoofing. Then, I will describe the Commission’s rules addressing Caller ID services 
and the steps the Commission is taking to make sure that providers are fully meet-
ing their obligations under the Communications Act and the Commission’s rules and 
orders. 

As  a  technical  matter,  Caller  ID  spoofing  happens  by  manipulating  the  data  ele-
ments  that  travel  with  a  phone  call.  Phone  calls  on  the  public  switched  telephone 
network,  or  PSTN,  are  routed  to  their  destinations  by  means  of  a  specialized  pro-
tocol called the Signaling System 7, or SS7. SS7 conveys information associated with 
a  call  such  as  the  telephone  number  of  the  caller.  The  SS7  information  for  a  call 
is  provided  by  the  carrier  that  the  caller  uses  to  place  the  call.  Caller  ID  then  dis-
plays  that  caller’s  number  to  the  called  party.  Caller  ID  spoofing  is  accomplished 
by manipulating the SS7 information associated with the call. 

The  Commission  addressed  Caller  ID  on  the  PSTN  in  1995  with  rule  64.1601, 
which generally requires all carriers using SS7 to transmit the calling party number 
associated with an interstate call to interconnecting carriers. The same Commission 
rule also requires telemarketers to transmit accurate Caller ID information. 

The  development  of  Internet  and  IP  technologies  has  made  Caller  ID  spoofing 
easier than it used to be. Now, entities using IP technology can generate false call-
ing  party  information  and  pass  it  into  the  PSTN  via  SS7.  Caller  ID  spoofing  can 
potentially  threaten  our  public  safety.  For  example,  spoofers  can  fabricate  emer-
gency  calls  and  cause  local  law  enforcement  and  public  safety  agencies  to  deploy 
their  resources  needlessly.  Caller  ID  spoofing  can  potentially  threaten  consumers. 
For  example,  spoofing  can  be  used  by  the  unscrupulous  to  defraud  consumers  by 
making calls appear as if they are from legitimate businesses or government offices. 
The Commission’s Enforcement Bureau (Bureau) has been investigating the issue 
of  Caller  ID  spoofing  since  the  summer  of  2005  when  information  regarding  junk 
fax spoofing came to our attention. To date, the Bureau has initiated investigations 
of  thirteen  companies  engaged  in  the  marketing  and  selling  of  Caller  ID  spoofing 
services  to  customers.  One  investigation  resulted  in  a  citation  against  a  tele-
marketer,  Intelligent  Alternatives,  for  rule  violations,  including  violations  of  the 
Caller ID rules under section 64.1601. We have sent formal Letters of Inquiry and, 
at  the  same  time,  served  subpoenas  to  compel  responses  to  our  inquiries.  In  some 
cases,  we  have  issued  subsequent  Letters  of  Inquiry  to  uncover  additional  evidence 
of possible violations of the Communications Act. 

Our investigations have revealed that the companies engaged in this practice are 
of varying degrees of sophistication that employ disparate methods and technologies 
to provide service to different types of customers. Some of the companies, for exam-
ple,  claim  they  are  providing  spoofing  services  only  to  customers  such  as  law  en-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

forcement  officials  or  private  investigators,  or  to  others  engaged  in  the  furtherance 
of  debt  collection  and  other  similar  objectives.  The  companies  also  allow  customers 
varying  amounts  of  flexibility  over  the  spoofing:  some  companies  claim  they  do  not 
allow  customers  the  ability  to  customize  the  false  number  to  be  displayed  on  the 
called  party’s  Caller  ID  while  others  do  provide  that  functionality.  This  last  char-
acteristic is particularly important when determining whether spoofers permit their 
customers  to  use  ‘‘9-1-1’’  as  a  spoofed  number  or  whether  the  customers  can  spoof 
the numbers of first responders and other emergency services providers. We are con-
tinuing to seek relevant information to assist us in fully understanding these issues 
and whether violations of the Communications Act or our rules have occurred. 

We  also  have  held  meetings  with  numerous  industry  representatives,  including 
wireline,  wireless,  and  Voice  over  Internet  Protocol  (VoIP)-based  companies,  to  de-
termine the impact of Caller ID spoofing on their consumers and networks. And, we 
have  coordinated  with  state  agencies,  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  and  other  in-
terested  organizations,  such  as  the  National  Emergency  Number  Association,  re-
garding their efforts to address and identify solutions to this problem. The Enforce-
ment  Bureau  is  committed  to  continuing  to  gather  and  analyze  information  about 
these  companies’  practices,  their  networks,  their  businesses,  their  customers,  and 
other germane information. 

In  addition  to  our  enforcement  efforts,  the  Commission  has  taken  affirmative 
steps to prevent those engaged in Caller ID spoofing for deceptive reasons from suc-
cessfully  accessing  the  personal  information  of  telecommunications  customers.  In  a 
recent  Order  tightening  the  Commission’s  Customer  Proprietary  Network  Informa-
tion or CPNI rules, the Commission determined that a carrier providing call history 
information  over  the  phone  to  a  customer  must  call  the  customer  at  the  account’s 
telephone  number  of  record  to  provide  such  information  rather  than  rely  on  Caller 
ID  as  an  authentication  method,  thereby  eliminating  one  of  the  major  tools  of 
pretexters. 

As the Commission indicated in its testimony before the House of Representatives 
Energy  and  Commerce  Subcommittee  on  Telecommunications  and  the  Internet  last 
year,  the  Commission  may  not  have  sufficient  authority  to  fully  address  this  issue; 
some  of  these  entities  do  not  appear  to  be  directly  regulated  by  the  Commission, 
an assertion made by some targets of our investigations. Thus, legislation that clari-
fies the Commission’s authority in this area would be helpful. 

In conclusion, the intentional manipulation of Caller ID information, especially for 
the  purpose  of  fraud  or  deception,  is  a  troubling  development  in  the  telecommuni-
cations  industry.  The  Commission  looks  forward  to  working  with  this  Committee, 
and other Members of Congress, to ensure the public maintains its confidence in the 
telecommunications  industry.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  you 
today. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Ms. Monteith. At any time, Senator 
Stevens,  since  you  have  to  leave  early,  that  you  want  to  go  ahead 
and ask questions, feel free. 

Mr. Cerasale? 

STATEMENT OF JERRY CERASALE, 

SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS, 

DIRECT MARKETING ASSOCIATION, INC. 

Mr.  CERASALE.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Nelson,  Senator 
Stevens,  Senator  Klobuchar.  It’s  a  privilege  to  be  here  today.  The 
Direct  Marking  Association  is  a  trade  organization  representing 
multi-channel  and  interactive  marketers  who  use  the  mail,  the 
phone, the Internet, e-mail, direct response TV, and radio to reach 
consumers and businesses. 

Spoofing of Caller ID harms the consumer. At a minimum, it de-
ceives  the  consumer.  More  so,  it  can  defraud  them  or  even  put 
them  in  harm’s  way.  Spoofing  of  ID  also  harms  the  company.  It’s 
actually  stealing  the  company’s  identification.  Stealing  the  ID  of 
the  company,  it  ruins  the  reputation,  those  actions  taken  by  the 
spoofer  are  believed  by  the  recipient  of  the  phone  call  to  be  the 
marketer  itself  calling  and  so  it  harms  both  the  consumer  and  the 
business if it’s done. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

We  believe  it  also  undermines  the  integrity  and  trust  in  this 
communication  channel,  which  also  is  harmful  to  the  economy,  to 
government  and  so  forth  as  we  look  at  communications  within  the 
United  States.  The  DMA  issued  guidance  about  spoofing  a  long 
time ago. It’s attached to my written testimony. 

Caller ID, properly used, helps the consumer. It let’s them know 
who  is  calling,  what  it  is  and  you  can  channel  your  phone  calls 
yourself  and  have  control  over  your  telephone  inbox.  So  long  ago, 
the DMA required its members to present Caller ID, including the 
name  of  the  company  and  send  not  fraudulent,  truthful—sending 
out that information. 

But  to  be  fully  useful,  Caller  ID  has  to—marketers  have  to  be 
able  to  change  Caller  ID  information.  If  I’m  calling  you  as  a  tele-
marketer, Senator Nelson and there’s the number and you want to 
try  and  get  back  to  me,  that  phone  number  will  be  consistently 
busy because it’s an outgoing telephone number. 

So  the  idea  is,  we  have  to  put  in  a  consumer  customer  service 
number  where  there  are  people  ready  to  respond  to  the  call,  re-
spond  to  the  request  from  the  consumer,  including  even  putting 
them on the company’s specific Do Not Call list. 

So there has to be an ability for the direct marketer to alter the 
Caller ID, but not for fraudulent purposes but to actually assist the 
consumer.  Also,  another  problem  is  the  duty  of  the  marketer 
should  be  to  transmit  to  the  carrier  the  proper  Caller  ID  informa-
tion.  We’ve  found  many  times  in  instances  that  in  presenting  it  to 
the consumer’s phone, the information sometimes gets garbled and 
the marketer should not—if they have transmitted the information 
correctly,  that  should  be  the  duty  of  the  marketer.  Now,  it’s  no 
doubt when it has happened, there have been times when the num-
ber  is  altered  when  it’s  received  by  the  consumer  so  that  the  local 
area code is placed in front of the number. And of course, the poor 
individual  who  then  has  that  number  that  gets  all  the  calls,  gets 
angry at the marketer and eventually we find out and try and work 
it out quickly and communications carriers are helpful in trying to 
fix  that  and  so  forth;  but  we  want  to  make  sure  that  the  liability 
on  the  marketer  is  to  transmit  to  the  carrier  the  proper  informa-
tion. That is the duty of the marketer. 

Looking  at  S.  704,  we  support  S.  704.  We  think  if  you  added  an 
intent  to  defraud  or  cause  harm  standard,  you  would  protect  the 
marketer,  those  situations  that  I  just  mentioned  in  the  sense  of 
changing  to  a  customer  service  number,  transmitting  the  proper 
number  to  the  carrier.  It  also  would  cover,  we  think,  some  of  the 
instances  that  you  mentioned,  Senator  Nelson,  concerning  the  po-
lice  trying  to  protect  police  numbers,  not  showing  them,  centers, 
shelters for homeless women, battered women that calling out, you 
don’t want to show the number of that. Put some other number in 
there, a social service number or something so that you can try and 
protect people. 

Those  are  things,  I  think,  that  we  need  to  try  and  protect  in  S. 
704, those kinds of changes. We want to go after the spoofers, give 
the  FCC  all  the  authority  it  needs  to  shut  these  people  down  and 
we  just  need  the  ability  to  make  Caller  ID  a  valuable  service  as 
long  as  we’re  not  using  it  to  defraud  or  deceive.  Thank  you  very 
much. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Cerasale follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JERRY CERASALE, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS, DIRECT MARKETING ASSOCIATION, INC. 

I. Introduction & Summary 

Good  morning  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  am  Jerry 
Cerasale, Senior Vice President for Government Affairs of the Direct Marketing As-
sociation,  and  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  the  Committee  as 
it examines S. 704 and the Caller ID spoofing issue in general. 

The  Direct  Marketing  Association,  Inc.  (‘‘DMA,’’  www.the-dma.org)  is  the  leading 
global  trade  association  of  businesses  and  nonprofit  organizations  using  and  sup-
porting  multichannel  direct  marketing  tools  and  techniques.  DMA  advocates  indus-
try  standards  for  responsible  marketing,  promotes  relevance  as  the  key  to  reaching 
consumers with desirable offers, and provides cutting-edge research, education, and 
networking  opportunities  to  improve  results  throughout  the  end-to-end  direct  mar-
keting process. Founded in 1917, DMA today represents more than 3,600 companies 
from dozens of vertical industries in the U.S. and 50 other nations, including a ma-
jority of the Fortune 100 companies, as well as nonprofit organizations. Included are 
catalogers, financial services, book and magazine publishers, retail stores, industrial 
manufacturers,  Internet-based  businesses,  and  a  host  of  other  segments,  as  well  as 
the service industries that support them. 

DMA  and  our  members  appreciate  the  Committee’s  continued  outreach  to  the 
business community on important issues such as Caller ID spoofing. DMA fully sup-
ports  the  efforts  of  Senators  Nelson,  McCaskill,  and  Snowe,  and  the  Committee,  to 
enact legislation prohibiting Caller ID spoofing. Spoofing is a malicious practice that 
undermines  Caller  ID  as  a  useful  verification  device,  and  can  cause  harm  to  both 
consumers  and  business.  DMA  has  long  recognized  Caller  ID  as  an  important 
enhancer to two-way communication between people making and receiving calls, es-
pecially  in  the  context  of  business  and  customer  relations.  Caller  ID  provides  con-
sumers with choice and control over their telephones. It alerts a consumer as to the 
identity of a caller and allows the consumer to choose whether to answer a call from 
a marketer offering a product or service of interest. 

Caller ID, when used for illegitimate purposes, can have a harmful effect on con-
sumers  and  legitimate  marketers  and  other  businesses.  Bad  actors  use  Caller  ID 
spoofing to damage a competitor’s reputation, to gain unauthorized access to a con-
sumer’s  personal  information,  and  to  commit  illicit  practices  such  as  phishing  and 
pretexting. The cumulative effect is consumer confusion, possible identity theft, and 
the transfer of ill will to legitimate businesses and marketers. We believe that spoof-
ing, and, in general, the manipulation of Caller ID for illegitimate purposes, should 
be prohibited. 

Understanding  the  importance  of  standards  and  best  practices  in  fostering  con-
sumer  choice,  DMA  several  years  ago,  working  with  our  members,  developed  and 
adopted Caller-ID Requirements as part of our Guidelines for Ethical Business Prac-
tice  (‘‘Guidelines’’),  to  specifically  discourage  illegitimate  telemarketing  practices 
that threaten to undermine consumer confidence and relations with legitimate mar-
keters.1 In 2004, in response to a rise in Caller ID spoofing, DMA issued an advisory 
detailing  marketers’  rights  and  responsibilities  when  using  Caller  ID  technology.2 
DMA requires its members, including nonprofits and other groups, to transmit Call-
er ID information. Specifically, when DMA members make marketing calls, they are 
required  to  transmit  the  name  of  the  seller  and  the  telephone  number  by  which  a 
called party can call back during normal business hours to ask questions or request 
not to receive future calls. Under our Guidelines, DMA members must not transmit 
a false name or telephone number. 

DMA  also  supports  the  importance  of  accurately  disclosing  identity  and  contact 
information in other forms of marketing communications. For example, in the e-mail 
context,  our  Guidelines  detail  responsible  practices  for  marketers  to  disclose  accu-
rate identifying information. The problems caused by inaccurate e-mail headers are 
similar  to  those  in  the  Caller  ID  spoofing  context.  In  2002,  in  response  to  illegit-
imate actors manipulating e-mail message headers, we developed and adopted Com-

1 Caller-ID/Automatic  Number  Identification  Requirements,  Article  #46,  DMA  Guidelines  for 
Ethical  Business  Practice,  at  23  (attached)  (available  at  http://www.the-dma.org/guidelines/ 
EthicsGuidelines.shtml). 

2 DMA  Statement  Caller-ID  Falsification,  September  2004  (attached)  (available  at  http:// 

www.thedma.org/guidelines/callerid/shtml). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

mercial  Solicitations  Online  requirements  as  part  of  our  Guidelines.3 Our  members 
are required to clearly disclose the marketer’s identity and street address in e-mail 
solicitations.  The  identity  of  the  sender  of  the  message  must  be  provided  clearly, 
honestly, and not in a misleading manner. The subject lines must accurately convey 
the content of the message, and the header information must be accurate. These re-
quirements  are  also  part  of  the  CAN–SPAM  Act  that  emerged  through  this  Com-
mittee. 
II.  Legislation  Should  Include  an  ‘‘Intent  To  Defraud  or  Cause  Harm’’ 

Requirement 

As  stated  at  the  outset,  DMA  supports  the  purpose  of  S.  704,  to  prevent  the  ma-
nipulation  of  Caller  ID  for  fraudulent,  spoofing  purposes.  While  the  practice  of 
spoofing to defraud or cause harm to a person is unacceptable, there are legitimate 
reasons for transmitting Caller ID information that is different from the calling par-
ty’s  information  that  the  Committee  should  ensure  are  not  restricted.  Blocking  or 
modifying Caller ID information is necessary in several contexts such as safety, pro-
tecting  privileged  communications,  and  in  business  and  customer  relations.  Busi-
nesses  rely  on  the  practice  of  modifying  Caller  ID  for  such  purposes  as  to  facilitate 
a consumer’s request to be placed on a business’s do-not-call list and to properly dis-
close  the  identity  of  the  entity  on  whose  behalf  a  third-party  marketer  is  calling. 
In order to ensure that non-spoofing activities that may involve display of Caller ID 
information that is different from that of the entity making the call are not uninten-
tionally  covered  by  the  legislation,  we  suggest  that  the  scope  of  conduct  covered  by 
the legislation should be narrowed to restrict only such acts committed with ‘‘intent 
to defraud or cause harm.’’ 

Inclusion  of  such  an  ‘‘intent  to  defraud  or  cause  harm’’  standard  will  serve  the 
purpose of explicitly recognizing that the widely adopted business practice of trans-
mitting  a  customer  service  telephone  number  in  place  of  the  calling  party’s  tele-
phone  number  is  not  restricted.  Without  such  an  intent  standard,  telemarketers 
that  substitute  a  customer  service  telephone  number  for  call  back  purposes  could 
be covered by the bill. This practice is, in fact, currently required under existing law 
whereby  marketers  are  required  to  transmit  a  telephone  number  through  a  caller 
identification  service  by  which  a  called  party  may  place  a  return  call  to  make  in-
quiries  or  request  that  their  telephone  number  be  added  to  the  calling  party’s  do- 
not-call list. Often businesses provide the telephone number of their customer serv-
ice department to facilitate such requests rather than the number of the calling par-
ty’s  line.  Businesses  that  employ  such  practices  are  not  seeking  to  defraud  or  mis-
lead customers, but rather transmitting the most relevant information and creating 
processes to efficiently respond to customer requests. 

In  addition,  we  are  aware  of  scenarios  where  the  Caller  ID  information  trans-
mitted from the telemarketer to a telecommunications carrier is not the same as the 
information provided by the carrier to the call recipient. With a strict liability stand-
ard, and with no intent standard, telemarketers could be liable for an act of the car-
rier  over  which  the  telemarketer  has  no  control.  Thus,  the  addition  of  an  ‘‘intent 
to defraud or cause harm’’ standard also will ensure that a telemarketer is only re-
sponsible  for  accurately  providing  Caller  ID  information  to  the  carrier  and  not  for 
incorrect transmission by the carrier. 

Requiring that a calling party provide its exact name and telephone number could 
jeopardize legitimate practices and restrain consumer preferences. Requiring ‘‘intent 
to  defraud  or  cause  harm’’  will  ensure  that  bad  actors  with  ill  intent  are  targeted 
by  the  legislation  rather  than  legitimate  practices,  customer  preferences,  and  the 
underlying  technology  used.  We  believe  that  tying  the  act  of  transmitting  mis-
leading  Caller  ID  information  with  an  intent  standard  appropriately  identifies  the 
offending  act  while  ensuring  that  businesses  are  not  liable  for  simple  mistakes  or 
other  instances  where  changing  the  Caller  ID  information  is  appropriate.  We  note 
that this is the approach that is in the Caller ID spoofing bills that recently passed 
the House of Representatives. 

* 

* 

* 

* 

Thank  you  for  your  time  and  the  opportunity  to  speak  before  your  Committee.  I 
look forward to your questions and working with the Committee on this legislation. 

* 

* 

* 

3 Commercial Solicitations Online, Article #38, DMA Guidelines for Ethical Business Practice, 

at 20 (attached) (available at http://www.the-dma.org/guidelines/EthicsGuidelines.shtml). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

EXCERPTS FROM THE DMA GUIDELINES FOR ETHICAL BUSINESS PRACTICE 

Commercial Solicitations Online 
Article #38 

Marketers  may  send  commercial  solicitations  online  under  the  following  cir-

cumstances: 

• The solicitations are sent to the marketers’ own customers, or 
• Individuals  have  given  their  affirmative  consent  to  the  marketer  to  receive  so-

licitations online, or 

• Individuals  did  not  opt  out  after  the  marketer  has  given  notice  of  the  oppor-

tunity to opt out from solicitations online, or 

• The marketer has received assurance from the third party list provider that the 

individuals whose e-mail addresses appear on that list: 
• have already provided affirmative consent to receive solicitations online, or 
• have already received notice of the opportunity to have their e-mail addresses 

removed and have not opted out, and 

• The individual is not on the marketer’s in-house suppression list 
Within  each  e-mail  solicitation,  marketers  should  furnish  individuals  with  a  no-

tice and an Internet-based mechanism they can use to: 

• Request that the marketer not send them future e-mail solicitations and 
• Request that the marketer not rent, sell, or exchange their e-mail addresses for 

online solicitation purposes 

If  individuals  request  that  their  names  be  removed  from  the  marketer’s  in-house 
online  suppression  list,  then  the  marketer  may  not  rent,  sell,  or  exchange  their  e- 
mail addresses with third parties for solicitation purposes. 

The  above  requests  should  be  honored  within  10  business  days,  and  the  market-
er’s  opt-out  mechanism  should  be  active  for  at  least  30  days  from  the  date  of  the 
e-mail solicitation. 

Only those marketers that rent, sell, or exchange information need to provide no-

tice of a mechanism to opt out of information transfer to third-party marketers. 

Marketers  should  process  commercial  e-mail  lists  obtained  from  third  parties 
using  DMA’s  E-Mail  Preference  Service  suppression  file.  E–MPS  need  not  be  used 
on  one’s  own  customer  lists,  or  when  individuals  have  given  affirmative  consent  to 
the marketer directly. 

Solicitations sent via e-mail should disclose the marketer’s identity and street ad-
dress. The subject and ‘‘from’’ lines should be clear, honest, and not misleading, and 
the  subject  line  should  reflect  the  actual  content  of  the  message  so  that  recipients 
understand  that  the  e-mail  is  an  advertisement.  The  header  information  should  be 
accurate.  A  marketer  should  also  provide  specific  contact  information  at  which  the 
individual can obtain service or information. 

* 

* 
Caller-ID/Automatic Number Identification Requirements 
Article #46 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

Wherever the technology is available marketers should: 
• Transmit a telephone number such as the telephone number of the seller, serv-
ice  bureau,  or  customer  service  department  that  the  consumer  can  call  back 
during  normal  business  hours  to  ask  questions  and/or  to  request  not  to  receive 
future calls and 

• Transmit the name of the seller or service bureau 
Marketers should not block transmission of caller identification or transmit a false 

name or telephone number. 

Telephone  marketers  using  automatic  number  identification  (ANI)  should  not 
rent,  sell,  transfer,  or  exchange,  without  customer  consent,  telephone  numbers 
gained  from  ANI,  except  where  a  prior  business  relationship  exists  for  the  sale  of 
directly related goods or services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

DMA STATEMENT CALLER-ID FALSIFICATION 

Falsely  altering  Caller-ID  information  for  marketing  purposes  is  not  only 

unethical, it is illegal! 

In response to recent news reports about a new Caller ID service that would allow 
subscribers to transmit false Caller-ID information, The DMA has issued this state-
ment to remind marketers about their rights and responsibilities when using Caller- 
ID technology. 

When  calling  customers  or  prospects,  it  is  deceptive  and  unlawful  for  a  marketer 
to  knowingly  substitute  and  transmit  a  false,  or  ‘dummy,’  telephone  number.  Rath-
er, wherever the technology is available, a marketer must: 
• transmit the name of the seller or service bureau; and 
• transmit an accurate and valid telephone number for the seller, the service bu-
reau,  or  respective  customer  service  department.  A  consumer  should  be  able  to 
call back this telephone number during normal business hours to ask questions 
and/or to request not to receive future calls. 

Please note that a marketer MAY transmit a Caller-ID telephone number that is 
DIFFERENT  from  the  number  from  which  the  call  is  coming  AS  LONG  AS  the 
number transmitted correctly identifies the name of the seller or service bureau and 
is  a  valid  number  that  the  consumer  may  call  back  during  normal  business  hours 
to  ask  questions  and/or  to  request  not  to  receive  future  calls.  For  example,  some-
times  it  may  be  necessary  to  transmit  a  Caller-ID  number  for  the  customer  service 
department,  instead  of  the  number  of  the  representative  who  is  calling  (since  the 
representative’s  number  will  likely  be  busy).  In  this  instance,  substituting  the  cus-
tomer service department number provides the consumer with a number he/she can 
call back for more information and/or to request to be put on the company’s do-not- 
call list. 

A marketer who intentionally creates and transmits inaccurate or false Caller-ID 
information  is  violating  Federal  law—for  starters,  the  Federal  Trade  Commission 
Act  (which  outlaws  unfair  and  deceptive  trade  practices),  the  Federal  Trade  Com-
mission’s Telemarketing Sales Rule, and the Federal Communications Commission’s 
Telephone Consumer Protection Act. 

Moreover,  transmitting  false  Caller-ID  information  violates  the  Direct  Marketing 
Association’s Guidelines for Ethical Business Practices (Article #44 and Article #51). 
Specifically,  Article  #44  (Caller-ID/Automatic  Number  Identification  Requirements) 
advises:  ‘‘Marketers  should  not  block  transmission  of  caller  identification  or  trans-
mit  a  false  name  or  telephone  number  . . .’’  Article  #51  (Laws,  Codes,  and  Regula-
tions)  calls  for  marketers  to  abide  by  state,  Federal  and  local  laws  governing  mar-
keting practices and business transactions. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Senator,  I’m  going  to  have  to  leave.  Could  I 
just  ask  if  you’d  do  two  things.  First,  there  is  a  House  bill,  H.R. 
251 that has been passed and has been sent to the Senate. Senator 
Kyl  has  a  bill,  S.  1654,  which  has  been  sent  to  Judiciary.  I  think 
there is a criminal side of this and there is also a communications 
side  of  it.  I’d  appreciate  it  very  much  if  you  could  give  us,  give  to 
our  staff,  any  suggestions  you  have  about  modifications  of  the  bill 
with  regard  to  the  communications  aspect  so  that  we  could  have 
that information before the mark up next week. 

I  do  believe  we  will  mark  up  the  bill  and  get  it  out  next  week, 
but  I’d  hope  that  we’d  be  able  to  make  any  changes  that  would  be 
necessary to get it to the floor in a manner that would not be con-
troversial.  I  think  if  you  have  amendments  that  we  can  consider 
next  week,  it  would  be  very  helpful.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  hope 
you’ll make me a co-sponsor, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator NELSON. Without objection. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
Senator NELSON. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator STEVENS. I also have questions I’ll file for the record. 
Senator NELSON. OK. Thank you, Mr. Cerasale. Ms. Knight? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

STATEMENT OF ALLISON KNIGHT, STAFF COUNSEL AND 

DIRECTOR, PRIVACY AND HUMAN RIGHTS PROJECT, 
ELECTRONIC PRIVACY INFORMATION CENTER (EPIC) 

Ms.  KNIGHT.  Good  morning.  Senator  Nelson,  Members  of  the 
Committee, thank you for the opportunity to testify today on Caller 
ID  spoofing  and  the  Truth  in  Caller  ID  Act  of  2007,  S.  704.  My 
name  is  Allison  Knight  and  I’m  Staff  Counsel  and  Director  of  the 
Privacy and Human Rights Project at the Electronic Privacy Infor-
mation Center. 

I’d  like  to  discuss  two  separate  and  important  privacy  interests 
related  to  the  issue  of  Caller  ID  spoofing  and  the  first  is  the  right 
for  call  recipients  to  be  free  from  pretexting  and  other  fraud  that 
can  lead  to  the  loss  of  their  privacy  and  the  threats  of  stalking, 
identity theft and harassment and we’ve heard from the other pan-
elists on this issue. 

The second is the rights of callers to limit the disclosure of their 
phone numbers in order to protect their privacy and in some cases, 
their  safety.  The  Truth  in  Caller  ID  Act  of  2007,  S.  704,  as  cur-
rently  drafted,  does  not  adequately  protect  both  of  these  interests. 
EPIC  recommends  that  any  ban  on  Caller  ID  spoofing  include  an 
intent  requirement  so  that  spoofing  is  only  prohibited  where  it  is 
clear  that  the  person  who  does  not  provide  identifying  information 
intends to defraud or to cause harm. 

EPIC recommended the inclusion of an intent requirement in tes-
timony on a similar bill introduced in the House last year and this 
intent  requirement  was  incorporated  into  the  version  of  the  bill 
that  recently  passed  in  the  House  that  was  just  referred  to,  H.R. 
251.  As  Mark  Rotenburg,  Executive  Director  of  EPIC  stated,  ‘‘an 
intent  requirement  preserves  the  privacy  rights  of  callers  and  per-
mits legitimate uses of spoofing while outlawing fraud and harass-
ment assisted by the technology.’’ 

We also have concerns about the provision in the Senate bill that 
permits  law  enforcement  agencies  to  possibly  misrepresent  their 
identities in the context of telecommunications services. 

Before  Caller  ID  services  were  offered,  telephone  customers  gen-
erally  had  the  ability  to  control  the  circumstances  under  which 
their phone numbers were disclosed to other people. Many individ-
uals have legitimate reasons to report a different number than the 
one  presented  on  Caller  ID.  For  example,  a  person  may  wish  to 
keep  his  or  her  direct  line  private  when  making  calls  from  within 
an organization. Similarly, an individual with multiple communica-
tions  devices,  such  as  a  landline  and  a  cell  phone  and  a  wireless 
handheld device, may want to route all returned calls to one device 
or a number. 

Now, in some circumstances, disclosure of a person’s phone num-
ber may also put his or safety at risk. Domestic violence survivors, 
shelters  and  other  safe  homes  need  to  preserve  the  confidentiality 
of their phone numbers. They may need to contact abusers without 
exposing  their  location  in  order  to  arrange  custody  or  other  legiti-
mate  matters.  They  may  also  need  to  contact  other  third  parties, 
such  as  businesses  that  have  permissive  privacy  policies  and  may 
share  collected  phone  numbers  with  lists  or  data  brokers.  In  all  of 
these  situations,  preserving  anonymity  is  necessary  for  the  caller’s 
safety. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Caller  ID  blocking  may  seem  like  a  viable  means  for  allowing 
callers  to  protect  their  anonymity  while  not  misleading  recipients, 
however  Caller  ID  blocking  is  not  a  complete  solution  because  a 
caller  can  be  identified  through  other  means,  first  of  all,  such  as 
the Automatic Number Identification System, which was developed 
for  emergency  services.  Also,  some  recipients  prevent  blocked  ID 
calls and indications are that the number of individuals doing this 
is growing. So in the case of a domestic violence survivor, attempt-
ing  to  safely  reach  a  required  phone  number,  an  individual  would 
have to use spoofing for the innocent purpose of preserving the con-
fidentiality of his or her number. 

We  can’t  ignore  the  privacy  interests  of  those  who  decline  to  ac-
cept calls from unknown numbers. If an individual has been habit-
ually harassed by phone calls from a Caller ID-blocked number, we 
should  not  permit  the  harasser  to  use  spoofing  as  a  means  to  cir-
cumvent  the  individual’s  screening  and  I  believe  this  is  the  pur-
pose, the reason that this bill was introduced. 

Caller  ID  spoofing  can  create  privacy  risks.  Last  year,  EPIC 
brought  to  Congress’s  attention,  the  problem  of  pretexting  con-
sumers’  phone  records.  Pretexting  is  a  technique  by  which  a  bad 
actor  can  obtain  an  individual’s  personal  information  by  imper-
sonating  a  trusted  entity.  For  these  reasons,  the  practice  of  spoof-
ing  for  the  purpose  of  fraud  or  for  harm  should  be  curtailed.  Pre-
venting spoofing for harmful reasons would hold illegitimate spoof-
ers accountable. 

Spoofing Caller ID numbers can create a real risk to individuals 
who might be defrauded or harmed by illegitimate uses of the tech-
nology,  at  the  same  time,  it’s  important  not  to  punish  those  who 
may  have  a  legitimate  reason  to  conceal  their  actual  phone  num-
bers.  The  inclusion  of  an  intent  requirement  in  the  Senate  bill 
would  focus  the  punishment  on  harmful  and  fraudulent  uses  of 
Caller  ID  spoofing  while  preserving  legitimate  uses  of  the  tech-
nique. 

In  addition,  an  intent  requirement  would  render  specific  exemp-
tions, such as for law enforcement unnecessary as a legitimate law 
enforcement  activity  that  employs  spoofing  would  be  protected  by 
the requirement to show an intent to defraud or cause harm. 
I’d be happy to answer any questions you have. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Knight follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALLISON KNIGHT, STAFF COUNSEL AND DIRECTOR, PRIVACY 

AND HUMAN RIGHTS PROJECT, ELECTRONIC PRIVACY INFORMATION CENTER (EPIC) 
Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and members of the Committee, thank 
you for the opportunity to testify today on Caller ID spoofing and the Truth in Call-
er  ID  Act  of  2007,  S.  704.  My  name  is  Allison  Knight  and  I  am  Staff  Counsel  and 
Director  of  the  Privacy  and  Human  Rights  Project  at  the  Electronic  Privacy  Infor-
mation  Center.  EPIC  is  a  non-partisan  research  organization  based  in  Washington, 
D.C.  that  seeks  to  focus  public  attention  on  emerging  civil  liberties  issues  and  to 
protect privacy, the First Amendment, and Constitutional values. 

Two separate and important privacy interests meet in the issue of Caller ID spoof-
ing. First, there is the right of callers to limit the disclosure of their phone numbers 
in  order  to  protect  their  privacy,  and  in  some  cases,  their  safety.  Second,  there  is 
the right for call recipients to be free from pretexting and other fraud that can lead 
to  the  loss  of  their  privacy,  and  the  threats  of  stalking,  identity  theft,  and  harass-
ment. 

The  Truth  in  Caller  ID  Act  of  2007,  S.  704,  as  currently  drafted  does  not  ade-
quately protect both interests. EPIC recommends that any ban on Caller ID spoofing 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

include  an  intent  requirement,  so  that  spoofing  is  only  prohibited  where  it  is  clear 
that the person who does not provide identifying information ‘‘intends to defraud or 
cause  harm.’’  EPIC  recommended  the  inclusion  of  an  intent  requirement  in  testi-
mony  on  a  similar  bill  introduced  in  the  House  last  year,1 and  this  intent  require-
ment  was  incorporated  into  the  version  of  bill  that  recently  passed  in  the  House.2 
As Marc Rotenberg, Executive Director of EPIC stated, ‘‘an intent requirement pre-
serves  the  privacy  rights  of  callers  and  permits  legitimate  uses  of  spoofing,  while 
outlawing  fraud  and  harassment  assisted  by  the  technology.’’ 3 We  also  have  con-
cerns  about  the  provision  in  the  Senate  bill  that  permits  law  enforcement  agencies 
to  possibly  misrepresent  their  identities  in  the  context  of  telecommunications  serv-
ices. 
Telephone  Customers  Have  Legitimate  Reasons  to  Withhold  Their  Phone 

Numbers 

The introduction of Caller ID services and the associated Automatic Number Iden-
tification (ANI) created new risks to privacy. Before these services were offered, tele-
phone customers generally had the ability to control the circumstances under which 
their  phone  numbers  were  disclosed  to  others.  In  many  cases,  there  was  little  need 
for a telephone customer to disclose a personal phone number if, for example, a per-
son  was  calling  a  business  to  inquire  about  the  cost  or  availability  of  a  product  or 
wanted information from a government agency. In other cases, there was a genuine 
concern that a person’s safety might be at risk. For example, women at shelters who 
were trying to reach their children were very concerned that an abusive spouse not 
be able to find their location.4 

In the context of the Internet and the offering of voice services over Internet Pro-
tocol  (VoIP),  there  are  additional  concerns  about  the  circumstances  under  which  a 
person  may  be  required  to  disclose  their  identity.  The  Supreme  Court  has  repeat-
edly  made  clear  that  the  right  to  be  anonymous  is  protected  by  the  First  Amend-
ment and also that the Internet is entitled to a high level of First Amendment pro-
tection.5 

Many  individuals  have  legitimate  reasons  to  report  a  different  number  than  the 
one presented on Caller ID. For example, a person may wish to keep her direct line 
private when making calls from within an organization. Such an arrangement legiti-
mately gives call recipients a number to which they can return a call, but prevents 
an individual person’s phone from being inundated with calls that should be routed 
elsewhere. 

In  addition  to  threatening  a  person’s  rights  to  privacy  and  to  freedom  of  speech, 
in  some  circumstances  disclosure  of  a  person’s  phone  number  may  also  put  his  or 
her safety at risk. For example, domestic violence survivors, shelters, and other safe 
homes  need  to  preserve  the  confidentiality  of  their  phone  numbers.  They  may  need 
to  contact  abusers  without  exposing  their  location,  in  order  to  arrange  custody  or 
other  legitimate  matters.  They  may  need  to  contact  businesses  the  abuser  is  ac-
quainted with, and that may share survivor information with the abuser. They may 
also need to contact other third parties, such as businesses that have permissive pri-
vacy policies, and thus share collected telephone numbers with list or data brokers. 
In all of these situations, preserving anonymity is necessary for safety.6 

1 The Truth in Caller ID Act of 2006, H.R. 5126. 
2 The  intent  requirement  was  also  included  in  the  Truth  in  Caller  ID  Act  of  2007,  H.R.  251. 
EPIC  testified  on  this  House  bill  on  February  28,  2007,  in  support  of  the  intent  requirement. 
The  Truth  in  Caller  ID  Act  of  2007,  H.R.  251  passed  the  House  on  June  12,  2007,  and  was  re-
ceived into the Senate and referred to the Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation 
on June 13, 2007. 

3 H.R.  5126,  the  Truth  in  Caller  ID  Act  of  2006:  Before  the  Subcomm.  on  Telecommunications 
and  the  Internet  of  the  H.  Comm.  on  Energy  and  Commerce,  109th  Cong.  (2006)  (statement  of 
Marc  Rotenberg,  President  and  Executive  Director,  Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center).  See 
also, H.R. 251, the Truth in Caller ID Act of 2007: Before the Subcomm. on Telecommunications 
and  the  Internet  of  the  H.  Comm.  on  Energy  and  Commerce,  110th  Cong.  (2007)  (statement  of 
Allison  Knight,  Director,  Privacy  and  Human  Rights  Project,  Electronic  Privacy  Information 
Center). 

4 Letter from National Network to End Domestic Violence to the House Committee on Energy 

and Commerce (May 16, 2006). 

5 Watchtower  Bible  &  Tract  Society  v.  Village  of  Stratton,  536  U.S.  150  (2002),  McIntyre  v. 
Ohio  Elections  Commission,  514  U.S.  334  (1995),  and  Talley  v.  California,  362  U.S.  60  (1960); 
ACLU v. Reno, 521 U.S. 844 (1997). 

6 Domestic  Violence  and  Privacy,  Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center  http://www.epic.org/ 

privacy/dv/. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Caller ID Blocking Does Not Adequately Protect Privacy Interests 

15 

Caller  ID  blocking  may  seem  like  a  viable  means  for  allowing  callers  to  protect 
their anonymity while not misleading recipients. However, Caller ID blocking is not 
a  complete  solution.  One  reason  for  this  is  that  Caller  ID  is  not  the  only  way  that 
a  caller  can  be  identified.  Another  system,  known  as  Automatic  Number  Identifica-
tion,  or  ANI,  will  still  disclose  a  caller’s  identity  in  many  situations,  regardless  of 
whether  or  not  the  caller  used  call  blocking.  This  means  that  many  businesses, 
emergency  service  providers,  and  anyone  with  a  toll-free  number  can  reliably  gain 
the phone number of a caller, even if Caller ID is blocked. Spoofing services can pro-
tect  the  anonymity  of  a  caller’s  ANI  data  when  calling  toll-free  numbers  and  those 
entities that use ANI identification. 

Some  recipients  prevent  blocked  ID  calls,  and  indications  are  that  the  number  of 
individuals  doing  this  is  growing.  In  the  case  of  a  domestic  violence  survivor  at-
tempting to safely reach a required phone number, an individual would have to use 
spoofing for the innocent purpose of preserving the confidentiality of his or her num-
ber. 

We  also  cannot  ignore  the  privacy  interests  of  those  who  decline  to  accept  calls 
from unknown numbers. If an individual has been habitually harassed by calls from 
a  caller-blocked  number,  we  should  not  permit  the  harasser  to  use  spoofing  as  a 
means  to  circumvent  the  individual’s  screening.  At  the  same  time,  it  is  clear  that 
there  could  be  prosecution  for  harassment  whether  or  not  additional  prohibition  on 
spoofing were enacted.7 
Spoofing Can Create Privacy Risks 

This is not to say that Caller ID spoofing is an unqualified good—far from it. Last 
year,  EPIC  brought  to  Congress’s  attention  the  problem  of  pretexting  consumers’ 
phone  records.8 Pretexting  is  a  technique  by  which  a  bad  actor  can  obtain  an  indi-
vidual’s  personal  information  by  impersonating  a  trusted  entity.  Pretexters  have 
spoofed  the  telephone  numbers  of  courthouses,  in  order  to  harass  people  for  sup-
posedly  missing  jury  duty,  threatening  fines  or  arrest  unless  they  turn  over  Social 
Security Numbers or other personal information.9 Rob Douglas of PrivacyToday.com, 
with  whom  EPIC  has  worked  on  the  pretexting  issue,  noted  how  fraudsters  would 
use  spoofing  services  in  order  to  fool  customers  into  thinking  that  fraudulent  calls 
were coming from trusted sources.10 

For  these  reasons,  illegitimate  spoofing  activities  should  be  curtailed.  Law  en-
forcement  and  telephone  companies  can  retrace  these  calls  to  the  originating  serv-
ice.11 A  spoofed  number  is  not  completely  anonymous  and  without  accountability. 
Preventing  spoofing  for  harmful  reasons  will  hold  illegitimate  spoofers  accountable. 
Intent Requirement 

The inclusion of an intent requirement in the Senate bill would focus the punish-
ment  on  harmful  and  fraudulent  uses  of  Caller  ID  spoofing  while  preserving  legiti-
mate uses of the technique. In addition, an intent requirement would render specific 
exemptions for law enforcement unnecessary, as legitimate law enforcement activity 
that  employs  spoofing  would  be  protected  by  the  requirement  to  show  intent  to  de-
fraud or cause harm. 
Significance of NSA Surveillance Program for Privacy of Call Records 

Mr. Chairman, I would also like to bring to the Committee’s attention our concern 
that the National Security Agency may have constructed a massive database of tele-
phone  toll  records  of  American  consumers.  Last  year,  EPIC  filed  a  complaint  with 
the  Federal  Communications  Commission  in  which  we  alleged  that  Section  222  of 
the Communications Act, which protects the privacy of customer record information, 

7 See 47 U.S.C. § 223; 47 U.S.C. § 227. 
8 Protecting  Consumers’  Phone  Records:  Before  the  Subcomm.  on  Consumer  Affairs,  Product 
Safety,  and  Insurance  of  the  S.  Comm.  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation,  109th  Cong. 
(2006) (statement of Marc Rotenberg, President and Executive Director, Electronic Privacy Infor-
mation  Center).  http://www.epic.org/privacy/iei/sencomtest2806.html;  Phone  Records  for  Sale: 
Why  Aren’t  Phone  Records  Safe  From  Pretexting?:  Before  the  H.  Comm.  on  Energy  and  Com-
merce,  109th  Cong.  (2006)  (statement  of  Marc  Rotenberg,  President  and  Executive  Director, 
Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center)  http://www.epic.org/privacy/iei/pretextltestimony.pdf. 
9 Sid  Kirchmeyer,  Scam  Alert:  Courthouse  Con,  AARPBulletin,  May  2006,  http:// 

www.aarp.org/bulletin/consumer/courthouselcon.html. 

10 Phone  Records  for  Sale:  Why  Aren’t  Phone  Records  Safe  From  Pretexting?:  Before  the  H. 
Comm.  on  Energy  and  Commerce,  109th  Cong.  (2006)  (statement  of  Robert  Douglas,  CEO, 
PrivacyToday.com), http://www.privacytoday.com/HC020106.htm. 

11 Peter Svenson, Caller ID Spoofing Becomes All Too Easy, USA Today, Mar. 1, 2006, http:// 

www.usatoday.com/tech/news/2006-03-01-caller-idlx.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

might have been violated.12 We urged the Commission to undertake an investigation 
of  this  issue.  In  light  of  the  ongoing  controversy  about  the  possibility  that  Federal 
privacy laws were violated, the need to pursue this investigation is clear. 

We  respectfully  ask  Members  of  this  Committee  to  support  EPIC’s  recommenda-
tion that the FCC undertake an investigation of the possibly improper disclosure of 
telephone  toll  records  by  the  telephone  companies  that  are  subject  to  the  privacy 
obligations  contained  in  the  Communications  Act.  If  the  Communications  Act  was 
violated, that should be of great concern to the Committee. 
Conclusion 

Spoofing  Caller  ID  numbers  can  create  a  real  risk  to  individuals  who  might  be 
defrauded  or  harmed  by  illegitimate  uses  of  this  technology.  At  the  same  time,  it 
is important not to punish those who may have a legitimate reason to conceal their 
actual  telephone  numbers.  The  inclusion  of  an  intent  requirement  in  the  Truth  in 
Caller ID Act of 2007 would significantly improve the bill by distinguishing between 
appropriate and inappropriate Caller ID spoofing. 

I will be happy to answer any questions you might have at this time. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Ms. Knight. Mr. Jones? 

STATEMENT OF HON. RON JONES, COMMISSIONER, 
TENNESSEE REGULATORY AUTHORITY; CHAIRMAN, 

CONSUMER AFFAIRS COMMITTEE, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 

OF REGULATORY UTILITY COMMISSIONERS 

Mr. JONES. Thank you, Senator Nelson and members of the Com-
mittee. NARUC represents the state public utility commissions, the 
PUCs in all 50 states, the District of Columbia and U.S. territories 
with  jurisdiction  over  telecommunications,  electricity,  natural  gas, 
water and other utilities and in this capacity, the PUCs are on the 
frontline  of  consumer  protection  in  these  areas  and  are  often  the 
first to learn of emerging consumer concerns. 

NARUC is pleased to be here in support of the enactment of Call-
er  ID  spoofing  legislation.  In  fact,  NARUC  considered  and  passed 
a  resolution  that  was  adopted  at  our  summer  meeting  in  2006.  As 
has  been  mentioned  here,  Caller  ID  spoofing  harms  consumers  in 
the  areas  of  identity  theft,  credit  card  fraud,  public  safety, 
endangerment, law enforcement interference and other areas. 

But  more  specifically  of  concern  to  NARUC,  NARUC  believes 
that  government  at  all  levels  must  be  able  to  identify  and  address 
new  and  novel  threats  in  a  timely  fashion  to  ensure  the  safety  of 
consumers.  Allowing  the  practice  of  Caller  ID  spoofing  to  continue 
may  reduce  consumer  trust  in  many  of  the  public,  commercial,  fi-
nancial  and  political  institutions  that  are  relied  upon  by  American 
consumers. 

NARUC  is  pleased  with  the  inclusion  of  language  in  S.  704,  ac-
knowledging  the  key  role  state  officials  play  in  protecting  con-
sumers through enforcement of state laws that are consistent with 
Federal rules. NARUC’s one suggestion for change in the bill would 
be  to  strike  the  section  limiting  state  action  while  a  Federal  en-
forcement action or proceeding is pending. Federal and state agen-
cies can mutually benefit from revelations gleaned from concurrent 
investigation  of  violations  of  their  respective  laws  and  we  see  a 
great benefit in not taking cops off the beat, so to speak. 

Consumer protection is and has been for a long time, a core com-
petency  of  state  commissions.  States  should  not  be  encumbered 
from investigation and enforcement of violations of state law. 

12 EPIC Complaint to the Federal Communications Commission (May 16, 2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

Caller ID spoofing is a key tool in identity theft efforts by crimi-
nals.  The  Federal  Trade  Commission  reports  that  10  million  indi-
viduals are victims of identity theft each year and identity theft is 
the number one consumer complaint. Passage of the Truth in Call-
er ID Act of 2007 will be a huge step forward in reducing the prob-
lem of identity theft. NARUC believes it will remove a major weap-
on that is Caller ID spoofing from the arsenal of criminals. 

Senator Nelson and members of the Committee, NARUC and its 
members  are  committed  to  working  with  you  to  protect  consumers 
and  we  urge  your  swift  passage  of  S.  704  to  end  the  practice  of 
Caller ID spoofing and we certainly thank you for inviting NARUC 
to  testify  before  the  Committee  and  I’d  be  happy  to  answer  any 
questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Jones follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON.  RON JONES,  COMMISSIONER,  TENNESSEE 
REGULATORY AUTHORITY;  CHAIRMAN,  CONSUMER AFFAIRS COMMITTEE,  NATIONAL 
ASSOCIATION OF REGULATORY UTILITY COMMISSIONERS 
Mr.  Chairman,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank 
you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  S.  704,  the  ‘‘Truth  in  Caller  ID  Act  of 
2007.’’ 

I  am  Ron  Jones,  Commissioner  with  the  Tennessee  Regulatory  Authority  and  a 
member of the National Association of Regulatory Utility Commissioners (NARUC). 
I  serve  as  Chairman  of  NARUC’s  Committee  on  Consumer  Affairs.  NARUC  rep-
resents  State  public  utility  commissions  (PUCs)  in  all  50  States,  the  District  of  Co-
lumbia  and  U.S.  territories  with  jurisdiction  over  telecommunications,  electricity, 
natural  gas,  water  and  other  utilities.  In  this  capacity,  PUCs  are  on  the  frontline 
of  consumer  protection  in  these  areas  and  are  often  the  first  to  learn  of  emerging 
consumer concerns. 

We commend you, Co-Chairman Stevens, the sponsors of this legislation Senators 
Nelson  and  Snowe,  your  staffs  and  other  committee  members,  for  addressing  the 
issue of Caller ID fraud, otherwise known as Caller ID spoofing. Caller ID spoofing 
is  an  issue  of  growing  concern  and  one  of  the  many  tools  criminals  can  use  to  per-
petrate fraud and steal the identities of hard-working, law-abiding Americans. 

I am pleased to be here today to present NARUC’s support for enactment of Caller 
ID  spoofing  legislation  that  would  prohibit  the  intentional  falsification  of  the  name 
or  number  that  appears  on  a  customer’s  caller  identification  (ID)  display.  A  resolu-
tion to this end was adopted at the NARUC Summer Meeting in 2006, which I have 
submitted for the record with my testimony. The resolution was adopted in response 
to  growing  consumer  complaints  concerning  the  practice  of  Caller  ID  spoofing  and 
notes the important role state PUCs play in policing such activities. 

The telecommunications industry has experienced a decade of unprecedented tech-
nological  innovation  bringing  consumers  an  array  of  new  communications  devices 
and  services.  Unfortunately,  with  new  technology  often  come  new  risks  and  in-
creased opportunities criminals can exploit for their own nefarious purposes. 

Previously, special equipment and knowledge was necessary to fake Caller ID in-
formation.  However,  the  rise  of  new  multifunctional,  user  friendly,  Internet  tech-
nologies and Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP) has put spoofing within easy reach 
of  scammers.  All  one  has  to  do  is  go  to  a  website,  pay  a  small  fee—often  as  low 
as $10—type in the number you’d like to call then input the name and number that 
you would like to be displayed on the call recipients Caller ID. It is as easy as that. 
How  is  Caller  ID  spoofing  being  used  and  how  is  it  harming  consumers?  There 
are several areas in which this technology is being used to harm consumers, includ-
ing but certainly not limited to: 

of obtaining personal information under false pretenses 

• Identity  theft:  Caller  ID  fraud  is  a  key  tool  in  pretexting  which  is  the  practice 
• Criminals  can  falsify  the  home  number  of  consumers  to  activate  or  make  pur-
• Emergency calls to 911 call centers can be fabricated diverting public safety re-
• Terrorists  could  use  it  to  mask  their  true  location  hampering  law  enforcement 

sources away from real emergencies 

chases on stolen credit cards 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

• An  ex-spouse  could  use  it  to  harass  a  former  wife  or  husband  who  has  blocked 

calls from their phone 

18 

Each  of  these  examples  is  alone  a  legitimate  reason  to  prohibit  the  practice  of 
Caller ID spoofing. Taken together they provide overwhelming evidence of the need 
for  this  legislation.  In  our  increasingly  technological  age,  government  at  all  levels 
must  be  able  to  identify  and  address  new  and  novel  threats  in  a  timely  fashion  to 
ensure  the  safety  of  consumers.  Allowing  the  practice  of  Caller  ID  spoofing  to  con-
tinue  may  reduce  consumer  trust  in  many  of  the  public,  commercial,  financial  and 
political institutions that are relied upon by American consumers. 

The  full  extent  of  Caller  ID  spoofing  is  difficult  to  ascertain.  By  its  very  nature 
the  goal  is  to  disguise  the  true  identity  of  the  perpetrator  and  their  motives.  In 
many  cases  a  consumer  may  not  even  know  they  were  a  victim  of  Caller  ID  spoof-
ing. States, like the Federal Government, are becoming more aware of this problem 
and are looking to prohibit the practice. 

In  my  home  State  of  Tennessee,  our  Senate  approved  Caller  ID  spoofing  legisla-
tion but it failed to pass the House. Although my state does not have a specific Call-
er  ID  spoofing  law,  we  are  collecting  information  and  learning  the  extent  of  such 
fraud through our oversight of the State Do Not Call (DNC) Registry. 

When  a  complaint  regarding  a  DNC  Registry  violation  is  received  from  a  con-
sumer, the Authority initiates an investigation. If it is subsequently determined that 
the  Caller  ID  information  utilized  in  the  violation  was  falsified,  it  is  noted  in  the 
record. A review of 2007 Do Not Call violations found forty-two complaints that the 
Regulatory Authority was not able to fully investigate because the originator of the 
call  could  not  be  determined  or  contacted.  This  happened  because  the  number  pro-
vided  to  us  by  the  Do  Not  Call  complainant  was  a  spoofed  number  and  could  not 
be traced back to the caller despite agency subpoenas for phone records of the com-
plainant in an effort to determine the identity of the caller. 

The forty-two complaints represent about 14 percent of the total Do Not Call com-
plaints  received  by  the  Tennessee  Regulatory  Authority  since  the  first  of  this  year. 
While  this  may  not  sound  like  a  large  percentage,  it  is  my  belief  that  this  number 
is  not  representative  of  the  true  scope  of  this  problem.  Regardless,  each  of  these 
identified  forty-two  instances  of  Caller  ID  fraud  is  a  potential  crime  and  therefore 
should not be condoned. 

To  elaborate  on  the  breadth  of  this  problem,  let  me  share  with  you  an  example 
of Caller ID fraud investigated by my colleagues in Nebraska. The Nebraska Public 
Service  Commission  investigated  a  slew  of  pre-recorded,  automatically  dialed  calls 
on  the  eve  of  the  November  2006  election.  The  Commission  received  several  com-
plaints  about  the  politically  motivated  calls  in  the  days  before  the  election.  Upon 
investigation, the Commission learned the numbers that appeared on the Caller ID 
were fraudulent and in most cases they were phone numbers that were unassigned. 
Even  with  the  help  of  the  phone  companies  they  were  unable  to  determine  the  ac-
tual source of the calls. 

NARUC is pleased with the inclusion of language in S. 704 acknowledging the key 
role  State  officials  play  in  protecting  consumers  through  enforcement  of  State  laws 
that  are  consistent  with  Federal  rules.  NARUC’s  one  suggestion  for  change  in  the 
bill would be to strike the section limiting State action while a Federal enforcement 
action  or  proceeding  is  pending.  Federal  and  State  agencies  can  mutually  benefit 
from revelations gleaned from concurrent investigation of violations of their respec-
tive  laws.  Consumer  protection  is  a  core-competency  of  State  commissions;  States 
should not be encumbered from investigation and enforcement of violations of State 
law. 

As I previously stated, Caller ID spoofing is a key tool in identity theft efforts by 
criminals.  The  Federal  Trade  Commission  reports  that  10  million  individuals  are 
victims  of  identity  theft  each  year  and  identity  theft  is  the  number  one  consumer 
complaint. Passage of the Truth in Caller ID Act of 2007 will be a big step forward 
in reducing the problem of identity theft. It will remove a major weapon, Caller ID 
spoofing, from the arsenal of criminals. 

Mr.  Chairman,  members  of  the  Committee,  NARUC  and  its  members  are  com-
mitted  to  working  with  you  to  protect  consumers.  We  urge  your  swift  passage  of  S. 
704 to end this practice. Thank you for inviting me to testify before you and I would 
be happy to answer any questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

RESOLUTION* SUPPORTING FEDERAL LEGISLATION TO COMBAT CALLER 

IDENTIFICATION SPOOFING 

Whereas,  Congress  is  considering  legislation  to  prohibit  the  intentional  falsifica-
tion  of  the  name  or  number  that  appears  on  a  consumer’s  caller  identification  (ID) 
display, commonly referred to as ‘‘Caller ID spoofing’’; and 

Whereas, The Truth in Caller ID Act of 2006, H.R. 5126, would make it unlawful 
for  a  person,  in  connection  with  any  telecommunications  service  or  VoIP  service,  to 
cause  any  caller  identification  service  to  transmit  misleading  or  inaccurate  caller 
identification information with the intent to defraud or cause harm; and 

Whereas, The use of Internet technology to make telephone calls has made Caller 

ID spoofing easier; and 

Whereas,  Caller  ID  spoofing  may  be  used  for  fraudulent  or  deceptive  purposes 
which could harm consumers and lessen consumers’ trust in the telecommunications 
industry; and 

Whereas,  Caller  ID  spoofing  may  also  threaten  public  safety  by  fabricating  emer-
gency  calls  and  thereby  diverting  public  safety  resources  away  from  real  emer-
gencies; and 

Whereas,  The  Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC)  is  attempting  to  ad-
dress  this  problem  through  enforcement  actions  and  coordination  with  the  Federal 
Trade Commission (FTC); and 

Whereas, The National Association of Regulatory Commissioners (NARUC) and its 
member  states  have  consistently  supported  and  encouraged  consumer  protection 
and safety issues; now therefore be it 

Resolved,  That  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  National  Association  of  Regulatory 
Commissioners (NARUC), convened in its 2006 Summer Meetings in San Francisco, 
California, expresses its support for Federal legislation that would make it unlawful 
for  a  person  to  transmit  misleading  or  inaccurate  caller  identification  information 
with the intent to defraud or cause harm; and be it further 

Resolved,  That  NARUC  is  committed  to  working  with  Congress,  the  FCC,  the 
FTC,  and  the  industry  on  a  comprehensive  approach  to  this  issue  in  order  to  edu-
cate and protect consumers from Caller ID spoofing. 

Senator  NELSON.  Thank  all  of  you  very  much.  Senator  Klo-

buchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you.  I’m 
sorry I missed the opening statements. I had another meeting and 
I’m the new Senator from Minnesota and I have a background that 
is  interesting  for  what  we’re  talking  about  today  because  I  prac-
ticed in the telecommunications area for 13 years and worked with 
NARUC  rather  extensively,  Mr.  Jones,  and  then  also  was  a  pros-
ecutor  for  8  years  and  so  I  dealt  with  these  issues.  In  fact,  my 
claim  to  fame  is  that  I  got  a  law  passed  in  Minnesota  banning 
Internet phishing but I still got elected somehow. 

Anyway,  my  focus  here  is  on  trying  to  solve  this  in  a  way  that 
works.  I’ve  encountered  these  things  before  where  if  you  do  things 
too broadly, you can make mistakes but at the same time, I’ve seen 
the  consequences  of  these  kinds  of  fraud  and  crime,  especially  in 
the  criminal  areas  where  perpetrators  might  try  to  pretend  they 
are someone else when they’re calling. And at the same time, I was 
very interested in what you were saying, Ms. Knight, because when 
I  was  a  prosecutor,  we  obviously  had  blocked  phones  and  I  know 
exactly  what  you  mean,  that  more  and  more  people  don’t  accept 
blocked phone calls so when you have victims of domestic abuse or 
people  at  shelters,  there  must  be  a  way  to  get  around  this.  So  I’m 

*Sponsored  by  the  Committees  on  Telecommunications  and  Consumer  Affairs.  Adopted  by  the 

NARUC Board of Directors August 2, 2006 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

very  interested  and  I  was  talking  to  Senator  Nelson  and  his  staff 
about some kind of slight change to this so that we make sure that 
those  things  wouldn’t  be  banned  or  get  someone  in  trouble  for 
doing that for what is really a good reason. 

So my questions are, well first of all, of you, Mr. Jones about the 
idea  of  striking  the  section  that  talks  about  allowing  state  action 
to  continue.  Are  there  state  actions  that  are  ongoing  in  this  area 
or do you have examples from around the country where people are 
looking into this? 

Mr. JONES. Well, Senator, I’m not aware of current state actions. 
I  know  in  the  State  of  Tennessee,  when  we  have  violations  of  the 
Do Not Call Registry and we seek to determine the manner of that 
violation,  often  times  that  we  determine  that  that  number  is  a 
spoof  call.  But  more  importantly,  what  we  seek  to  try  to  preserve 
is the ability for states, when they do take action or decide to take 
action,  to  pursue  Caller  ID  spoofing  and  as  such,  consider  legisla-
tion  that  they  are  able  to  do  so  and  they  are  not  encumbered  by 
a prohibition in Federal law from moving forward. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Then,  Ms.  Monteith,  did  I  say  your  name 
correctly? It’s easier than mine. But this is based on your prepared 
testimony about how the FCC has met with some of the companies, 
wireless  and  wireline  and  Voice  over  Internet  Protocol  companies, 
about the Caller ID spoofing issue. Could you talk a little bit about 
what  they  said  in  terms  of  any  work  that  is  being  done  to  try  to 
address the issue coming from the private sector? 

Ms.  MONTEITH.  Our  meetings  with  service  providers  were  aimed 
at  both  understanding  potentially  how  this  works  within  the  tele-
communications network and also discussing with them whether or 
not they were getting complaints from their customers about spoof-
ing  activities.  We  did  learn  how  this  happens  in  the  network,  and 
as  I  mentioned,  there  are  a  variety  of  different  ways  in  which  a 
number can be spoofed. 

In  terms  of  complaints,  we  get  complaints  and  I  think  some  of 
the  telecom  carriers  have  gotten  complaints,  and  they  try  to  re-
dress  them  in  a  variety  of  ways.  Sometimes,  as  I  think  the  Com-
mittee  is  aware,  we’ve  found  it  is  difficult  to  determine  where  the 
spoofing is coming from. Sometimes it is couched as telemarketing. 
Sometimes  it  is  harassment  types  of  complaints  and  it  is  often 
times difficult to identify who is at the bottom of it. 

I’m not sure I’ve addressed your question. I’m sorry, Senator. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  No,  and  I  can  talk  to  some  of  them,  too. 
You  know,  sometimes  there  can  be  technological  answers  to  these 
things  because  it  is  often  like  looking  for  a  needle  in  a  haystack, 
as  you  mentioned,  to  try  to  find  the  perpetrator  and  beyond  that, 
I remember we dealt with this with the phishing issue. Often times 
people  are  victims  and  they  don’t  know  it.  You  didn’t  hear  a  com-
plaint  because  there  is  some  marketer  and  maybe  they  didn’t  re-
spond  positively  so  we  never  knew  it  happened.  But  I  just  won-
dered  if  you  have  seen  that  happening,  if  you  think  there  is  a  lot 
more of this going on than we know of. 

Ms. MONTEITH. That may be the case. In just looking at the com-
plaint  numbers  that  the  Commission  has  received,  we  really  have 
not  seen  what  we  would  characterize  as  a  large  number  of  con-
sumer  complaints.  For  example,  in  2005,  we  received  two  dozen 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

complaints. In 2006, roughly double that, about 60 complaints, and 
so  far  this  year,  around  30  complaints.  Those  are  not  large  num-
bers of complaints when you’re talking about consumers nationwide 
having the ability to file complaints with the FCC. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Although  some  people  might  complain  to 

the Attorney General’s Offices in their state. 

Ms. MONTEITH. Correct. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. I mean, I just remember with the phishing 
issue,  it  was  clearly  going  on.  The  banks  were  really  upset  about 
it. Their names were being used fraudulently on these e-mails and 
it was going on everywhere and when someone was a victim, it was 
bad  because  they  would  maybe  lose  hundreds  of  thousands  of  dol-
lars.  But  there  were  many  victims  that  didn’t  know  they  were  vic-
tims and I’m wondering if that’s a little bit of what’s going on here. 
I don’t think I’d remember if I see some marketing firm on a Caller 
ID.  I  might  not  answer  the  phone  and  never  even  know  it  hap-
pened.  So  do  you  think  it’s  possible  that  there  is  more  of  it  going 
on that isn’t reflected in the complaints? 

Ms. MONTEITH. Yes, I do think that that’s possible. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  All  right,  good.  I  just  wondered,  Ms. 
Knight,  if  you  could  just  talk  a  little  bit  more  about  the  victim 
angle  here  and  the  privacy  angle  in  terms  of  making  sure  as  we 
look at how we could couch some language on the intent and make 
it  narrow  enough  that  it  doesn’t  preclude  prosecution  of  these 
crimes.  Sometimes  it’s  hard  to  prove  intent  but  if  you  have  some-
one  who  is  stealing  money  or  something,  it  makes  it  a  lot  easier. 
But could you give me your thoughts on that? 

Ms.  KNIGHT.  Sure.  The  language  that  EPIC  has  recommended 
would be including an intent to defraud or to cause harm. Another 
reason  that  we  chose  those  two  terms  was  that  first  of  all,  fraud 
would  generally  deal  with  commercial  violations  and  would  imply 
monetary  damages  and  then  second,  harm  would  appropriately 
widen the intent requirement beyond strictly fraudulent activity to 
capture  threats  to  physical  safety  associated  with  activities  such 
stalking and domestic violence that I spoke about earlier. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  OK,  thank  you.  Mr.  Cerasale,  you’re  the 
only one I didn’t ask a question of, so I guess my last question will 
be for you. I’d asked Ms. Monteith about any efforts in the private 
sector  of  looking  at  this  issue  and  I  wondered  if  you  knew  of  any 
from a technological standpoint? 

Mr.  CERASALE.  Well,  from  a  technological  standpoint,  our  mem-
bers—as we said, most of them do, if they are telemarketers, alter 
the  Caller  ID  number  that  is  transmitted  to  a  customer  service 
number  where  someone  will  answer.  They  keep  a  record  of  watch-
ing  what  kind  of  problems  they  find,  problems  in  the  final  trans-
mission  of  the  Caller  ID  information  to  the  recipient.  Sometimes 
that  can  be  garbled  and  they  work  with  the  carriers  to  try  and  fix 
that.  They  have  not,  at  this  point—there  has  not  been,  from  a 
straight  marketer’s  point  of  view,  a  great  clamor  to  the  DMA  that 
this  is  a  major  problem.  We  are  starting  to  hear  it  some  from 
banks  and  so  forth,  similar  to  phishing.  I  think  you  have  to  look 
at this as telephone phishing and it starts with the banks. ‘‘Please 
give  me  your  number.  We  have  a  problem  with  our  computer  sys-
tem and I need this.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

So  those  kinds  of  things  are  what  we’re  starting  to  see  and  they 
tend  to  be  a  spoofing  of  someone  with  whom  you  have  a  true, 
strong  customer  relationship.  With  so  many  phone  numbers  on  a 
National  Do  Not  Call  Registry,  there  are  many  consumers  who  do 
not, if they are on the registry and someone is spoofing, they don’t 
care about that. They’re just going to call. Many of those consumers 
don’t  answer  the  phone.  So  then  that  spoofing  may  occur,  as  you 
spoke about and it’s not reported, because I don’t respond, because 
I’m not supposed to be receiving telemarketing phone calls, because 
I’m  on  the  list.  But  if  I  receive  something  from  my  bank  or  some-
thing  where  I  have  a  really  close  relationship,  those  are  the  ones 
that  will  be  answered  and  we’re  starting  to  hear  some  noise  from 
banks  on  that.  And  it  looks  like  it  may  be  that  banks  and  similar 
types  of  financial  institutions  are  going  to  do  the  same  thing 
they’ve done with phishing—we will never call you and ask you di-
rectly  for  your  account  numbers,  just  like  we’ll  never  send  you  an 
e-mail asking for your account numbers. And I think that’s the way 
that  we  see  beginning,  from  a  marketers’  standpoint,  of  trying  to 
combat  the  spoofing  of  a  financial  institution  to  try  and  defraud. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  thank  you.  Now,  I  would  point  out, 
when  we  embarked  on  this  phishing  adventure  a  few  years  ago  in 
our  state,  I  just  noticed  yesterday—I  was  reading  the  Star  and 
Tribune  in  Minneapolis  and  they  had  just  convicted  someone  or 
charged  someone.  So  I  think  that  I  wanted  to  thank  Senator  Nel-
son for being out front on this with Senator Snowe. 

I think just because we’ve seen a creeping number of complaints 
going up is all the more reason that you want to get at least some 
tools in place that law enforcement can use, knowing we don’t real-
ly know what direction this will go. But at the same time, making 
sure that we protect the privacy interests and I believe, some of the 
state interests, as the witnesses pointed out. Thank you very much. 
Senator  NELSON.  Senator  Klobuchar  will  be  added  as  a  co-spon-

sor. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Senator NELSON. Senator Sununu? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I just have a couple 
of questions. First let me begin with some basic questions that Sen-
ator  Stevens  had  and  that  is  just  viewing  these  things  from  the 
consumers’  perspective.  I  guess  for  each  of  our  panel  members, 
maybe we can start with Ms. Monteith, if a consumer has concerns 
or  is  a  victim  of  domestic  abuse,  or  they  have  a  complaint  or  con-
cern  about  these  kind  of  fraudulent  activities,  is  there  anything 
they  can  do  to  verify  the  accuracy  of  Caller  ID  information  that  is 
being presented to them through their phone system? 

Ms. MONTEITH. I do not know the answer to that question, other 
than  the  information,  obviously,  is  displayed  on  their  customer 
equipment  and  calling  back  the  telephone  number  that’s  displayed 
to  attempt  to  verify  whether  or  not,  in  fact,  it’s  the  entity  that  it 
purports  to  be,  or  checking  with  their  telecommunications  carriers 
and  looking  at  their  call  records  to  determine  where  calls  came 
from. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

But  let  me  look  into  that  question  and  I’d  be  happy  to  get  back 

with you. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Thank  you.  Second  and  more  broadly,  there 
certainly  was  an  increase  in  the  number  of  complaints  from  2005 
to  2006  regarding  spoofing.  The  number  went  from  24  complaints 
to 60 complaints. This year, we’re about halfway through the year. 
We’ve  had  30  complaints.  It  certainly  doesn’t  represent  a  dramatic 
increase  and  I  think  overall,  it’s  a  relatively  modest  number.  So  I 
have  two  basic  questions.  First,  is  that  level  of  activity  necessary 
to  do  a  new  piece  of  legislation  and  the  second  is  whether  or  not 
the  FTC  already  has  the  authority  to  deal  with  a  good  deal  of  the 
fraudulent activity. 

As  you  know,  the  FCC  has  a  responsibility  and  oversight  for  a 
lot  of  the  IP  and  broadband  voice  services.  So  one,  given  the  level 
of  complaints  and  problems  and  two,  given  that  the  FCC  already 
has some authority in this area, is there is a pressing need for new 
legislation and if you think that there is, what specific enforcement 
tools are missing that aren’t available already? 

Ms.  MONTEITH.  I  can’t  comment  on  the  need  for  legislation.  I 
would  need  to  let  the  Commissioners  and  the  Chairman  speak  for 
themselves on that matter. I would say that the FCC would inves-
tigate  any  consumer  complaint,  regardless  of  the  number  of  con-
sumer  complaints  that  come  to  us.  So  in  fact,  we’re  looking  at  the 
consumer  complaints  that  have  been  filed  with  us  and  have  taken 
the  initiative  to  open  investigations  on  this  issue  when  it  came  to 
our attention. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  But  there’s  nothing  restricting  you  from  open-
ing  investigations?  There’s  nothing  restricting  you  from  enacting 
penalties where fraudulent activity is found? 

Ms.  MONTEITH.  With  respect  to  penalties,  two  things,  I  think. 
One, we’ve already testified that it’s not clear that we have the au-
thority  in  this  area  over  entities  that  are  not  directly  regulated  by 
the Commission and, in fact, that issue has been raised in response 
to  our  Letters  of  Inquiry  by  some  of  the  targets  of  our  investiga-
tions. And second—— 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Specifically  what  entities  are  you  talking 
about?  As  a  legislator,  I  would  hope  that  you  don’t  have  any  au-
thority  over  entities  that  aren’t—you  don’t  specifically  have  juris-
diction over. In other words, we set up jurisdictional boundaries for 
the clear purpose of not having overlapping regulations of adminis-
tration  and  oversight.  So  if  there  are  specific  entities  that  you  be-
lieve  you  ought  to  have  oversight  over,  you  need  to  be  specific 
about that, about where those gray areas might exist. 

But  let  me—my  understanding  is  you  have  oversight  of  telecom 

carriers, which has a long legal history of definition. Go ahead. 

Ms. MONTEITH. That’s correct. I’m talking about entities that are 
not  directly  regulated  by  the  Commission,  and  not  commenting  on 
whether  we  ought  to  have  jurisdiction,  merely  pointing  out  that 
there is a question mark that has been raised in our investigations 
as  to  whether  we  do  have  jurisdiction,  since  these  entities  are  not 
directly regulated by the Commission and do not appear to be com-
mon carriers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Senator  SUNUNU.  But  with  regard  to  those  that  you  do  have  ju-
risdiction over, you have the ability to open cases, to carry through 
enforcement and to levy penalties, correct? 

Ms. MONTEITH. That is correct. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  Would  the  other  panel  members  like  to  com-

ment? 

[No response.] 
Senator SUNUNU. OK. Is there any specific enforcement tool, put-
ting  aside  the  issue  of  coverage  or  jurisdiction,  any  enforcement 
tool that any of the panel members want to highlight as being un-
available right now or lacking right now in current legislation? 

[No response.] 
Senator SUNUNU. OK, thank you, Mr.—I’m sorry, who is—it is a 
Chairman today? Mr. Chairman. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I don’t 
want  any  trouble  there.  Senator  Klobuchar’s  chair  is  much  larger 
than yours so I was entirely confused. I apologize. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  We  need  a  visual  for  that  to  understand. 

Senator NELSON. As a matter of fact, I’m surprised that Senator 
Inouye and Senator Stevens allow Senator Rockefeller to have that 
big chair here. But because of his back, he has to have it. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And it makes me look too small. Please con-

Thank you. 

tinue. 

Senator NELSON. I want to ask you with the fact that Voice over 
Internet  Protocol  is  increasingly  becoming  a  reality  and  we  esti-
mate  some  nine  million  customers  today  are  using  telephone  calls 
through  VoIP.  And  the  fact  that  the  FCC  has  jurisdiction  directly 
over traditional telephone calls and that VoIP service providers are 
not  clearly  subject  to  the  same  FCC  Caller  ID  regulations.  So  I 
wanted  to  ask  any  of  you,  do  you  think  that  this  legislation  plugs 
the hole with regard to new technologies like VoIP? 

Ms. MONTEITH. Yes, it appears to do so. The only issue we might 
bring  to  your  attention,  Senator  Nelson,  is  that  the  definition  of 
VoIP  that  is  crafted  in  the  legislation  does  not  include  a  provision 
for VoIP service that might be provided without a fee. 

Senator NELSON. Without what? 
Ms.  MONTEITH.  Without  a  fee.  In  other  words,  some  VoIP  serv-

ices may be provided free of charge. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  would  that  not  be  within  the  jurisdiction 

of the FCC? 

Ms.  MONTEITH.  Certainly  not  currently  and  in  reading  the  legis-
lation,  I  believe  the  legislation  defines  VoIP  as  two-way  commu-
nications  provided  for  a  fee,  directly  to  the  public  for  a  fee.  There 
may be some services that are provided—— 

Senator  NELSON.  So  if  we’re  trying  to  get  our  hands  around 
spoofing  and  we  want  you  to  have  the  regulatory  authority,  we’ve 
got to make that exception. 

Ms.  MONTEITH.  I  believe  that  it  might  be  appropriate  to  include 

that language and we’d be happy to work with your staff. 

Senator  NELSON.  OK,  thank  you  for  that  recommendation.  Com-
missioner Jones, you have stated in your testimony that some tele-
marketers are using spoofing to avoid the Do Not Call list enforce-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

ment. Do you think that this legislation will fix that problem? And 
will it make the Do Not Call lists’ enforcement easier for you? 

Mr.  JONES.  Yes,  sir.  The  legislation  goes  a  long  way  in  address-
ing that and certainly enforcement will be easier based on the pen-
alties  that  are  being  proposed  in  there.  But  of  course,  that  would 
only be honored by those who are not bad actors. But certainly, we 
believe  that  goes  a  long  way  and  as  I  stated  earlier,  what  we  be-
lieve  is  that  what  would  make  it  even  stronger  is  to  not  prohibit 
the states from engaging in a concurrent investigation to the extent 
that state laws allow them to do so. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  you  think  the  legislation  as  it  is  written, 

would prohibit the states? 

Mr.  JONES.  From  engaging  in  concurrent  investigations,  yes,  sir. 
Senator NELSON. OK. Are there any other tools that you see that 

we need on the Federal level to stop all of this practice? 

Mr.  JONES.  Well,  Senator,  if  I  could  think  about  that  a  little  bit 

and get something back to you, I would appreciate that. 

Senator NELSON. Well, while you’re thinking about it, go beyond 

spoofing. 

Mr. JONES. OK. 
Senator NELSON. And are there any other telecommunications re-

lated scams that we need to examine? 

Mr.  JONES.  Well,  beyond  spoofing,  I  think  the  major  one,  which 
is  not  strictly  telecommunications  but  the  convergence  of  tech-
nology  with  the  phishing  example  that  was  given  earlier,  which  is 
a  form  of  web-based  spoofing  and  the  URL  redirection  that  accom-
panies  that,  and  that’s  the  part  of  that  particular  effort  that  ren-
ders the victim unable to know that he or she has been spoofed be-
cause of the URL redirection. I think, to the extent that that tech-
nology  gap  is  also  considered  to  be  closed,  then  that  certainly  will 
go  a  long  way  in  stopping  the  spoofing  in  all  of  its  forms,  whether 
it  is  telecommunications  through  Caller  ID  or  whether  it  is  web- 
based, along with the URL redirection that accompanies that. 

Senator  NELSON.  You  all  have  suggested  that  we  add  the  intent 
to defraud or cause harm. Does anybody disagree with that on the 
panel, if that is needed to be added to the bill? 

Ms.  MONTEITH.  Senator  Nelson,  I  don’t  know  that  the  Commis-
sion  has  taken  a  position  on  that  and  again,  I  would  be  happy  to 
get back to your staff on that issue, after speaking with the Chair-
man’s Office and the Commissioner’s. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  are  there  any  other  tools  that  you  think 

that we need to consider in cracking down on this practice? 

Ms. MONTEITH. No. I do not. 
Senator NELSON. OK. Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  You’ve  been  very  helpful.  Thank  you  to  all 

four of you. 

Senator NELSON. Well, thank you all. It was a very enlightening 
hearing  and  we  will  proceed  with  your  suggestions  as  we  mark  up 
the bill next week. Thank you and the hearing is adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 11:03 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Millions of Americans use caller identification services to check the name or num-
ber  of  a  calling  party  before  they  answer  the  phone.  Historically,  this  information 
has been highly reliable, as attempts to provide false Caller ID information required 
specialized  equipment  and  knowledge.  However,  with  the  growth  of  Internet-based 
calling  technologies,  the  ability  to  send  false  Caller  ID  information  has  become  sig-
nificantly easier. 

As  a  result,  criminals  have  seized  this  opportunity.  They  rely  on  sending  fraudu-
lent  Caller  ID  information,  a  practice  known  as  spoofing,  to  cloak  their  identities. 
These con artists gain their victims trust by posing as financial institutions or gov-
ernment agencies and use that trust to deceptively obtain personal information that 
enables identify theft or other forms of fraud. 

To combat this spoofing problem, Senators Nelson, Snowe, and McCaskill have in-
troduced legislation S. 704, that would amend the Communications Act to explicitly 
prohibit the transmission of misleading or inaccurate Caller identification in connec-
tion with traditional phone as well as Voice over Internet Protocol services. 

I  support  them  in  these  efforts  and  look  forward  to  the  testimony  from  today’s 

witnesses. 

Æ 

(27) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Jul 05, 2012 Jkt 074894 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\74894.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

